Illinois, session 104th, HB3719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Telephone System Act is amended 5by adding Section 85 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 750/85 new)7    Sec. 85. Encrypted police scanner transmissions. A law 8enforcement agency that encrypts police scanner transmissions 9must provide, by license or otherwise, real-time access to 10those transmissions to broadcast stations, broadcasting 11stations, and radio broadcast stations, as those terms are 12defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, and to newspapers, as that term is 13described in Section 5 of the Notice By Publication Act. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 151, 2026.